
DI1AL−09

A05868

LHD

RHD
DLC3

DLC3

Hand−Held
Tester

Hand−Held
Tester

N09214

DLC3

−DIAGNOSTICS ENGINEIMMOBILISERSYSTEM(2UZ −FE)
DI−747

LAND CRUISER (W/G) (RM616E)

PRE−CHECK
1.DIAGNOSISSYSTEM
(a)Description

ECM controls the function of immobiliser on this vehicle.
Data of the immobiliser or DTC can be read form DLC3 of
the vehicle. When a trouble occurs on immobiliser, MIL
does not light up but DTC inspection is performed.
Therefore when there seems to be a trouble on immobilis-
er,useTOYOTAhand −held testerorSSTtocheckand
troubleshoot it.

(b) Check the DLC3.
The vehicle’s engine ECU uses ISO 14230 for commu-
nication. The terminal arrangement of DLC3 complies
with SAE J1962 and matches the ISO 14230 format.

Terminal No. Connection / Voltage or Resistance Condition

7 Bus Line /Pulsegeneration During transmission

4 ChassisGround � BodyGround /1 � or less Always

16 BatteryPositive � BodyGround /9 � 14V Always

HINT:
If your display shows ”UNABLE TO CONNECT TO VEHICLE”
whenyouhaveconnected thecableof thehand −held tester to
DLC3, turned the ignitionswitchONandoperated thehand −
held tester, there is a problem on the vehicle side or tool side.
S If communication isnormalwhen the tool isconnected to

another vehicle, inspect DLC3 on the original vehicle.
S If communication isstill notpossiblewhen the tool iscon-

nected to another vehicle, the problem is probably in the
tool itself, so consult the Service Department listed in the
tool’s instruction manual.
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2. INSPECT DIAGNOSIS (Normal Mode)
(a) Check the DTC using hand−held tester.
NOTICE:
Hand−hel d t est er onl y: When t he di agnosi s syst em i s
switched from normal mode to check mode, it erases all
DTCs and freezed frame data recorded in normal mode. So
bef ore sw i t chi ng m odes, al w ays check t he DTCs and
freezed frame data, and note them down.

(1) Prepare the hand−held tester.
(2) Connect the hand−held tester to DLC3.
(3) Turn the ignition switch ON and push the hand−held

tester main switch ON.
(4) Use the hand−held tester to check the DTCs and

freezed frame data, note them down. (For operating
instructions,see thehand −held tester instruction
book.)

(5) See page DI−17, DI−97 to confirm the details of the
DTCs.

(b) Check the DTC (Using diagnosis check wire)
(1) Turn ignition switch ON.
(2) Using SST, connect between terminals 11 (TC) and

3 (E1) of DLC1.
SST09843 −18040
(3) Read the diagnostic trouble code from malfunction

indicator lamp.
HINT:
S If adiagnostic troublecode isnotoutput, check theTCter-

minal circuit.
S ECMcontrols the immobiliser functionon thisvehicle,

DTC is out put with engine data.

As an example, the blinking patterns for codes; normal, 12 and
99 are shown in the charts.
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(4) When DTC ”99” is output, there is a trouble of
immobiliser. Start troubleshooting referring to
PROBLEM SYMPTOMS TABLE.

(5) After completing the check, disconnect terminals 13
(TC) and 4 (CG) and turn off the display.

HINT:
In the event of 2 or more malfunction codes, indication will begin
from the smaller numbered code and continue in order to the
larger.
(c) Clear the DTC.

The following operations will erase the DTCs and freeze
frame data.
(1) Operating the OBD ll scam tool (complying with

SAEJ1978)orTOYOTAhand −held tester toerase
the codes. (See the OBD ll scan tool’s instruction
book for operating instructions.)

(2) Disconnecting the battery terminals or EFI fuse.


